North Carolina, session 2025, SB202.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes relating to the
use of the highways of the State and the operation of motor vehicles are applicable to the streets,
roadways, and alleys on the properties owned by or under the control of the Park South Station
Master Association, Inc., or the members of the Park South Station Master Association, Inc. For
the purposes of this act, streets, roadways, and alleys in the Park South Station Community shall
have the same meanings as highways and public vehicular areas pursuant to G.S. 20-4.01. A
violation of any of those laws is punishable as prescribed by those laws.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a law enforcement officer
of a law enforcement agency that has contracted with the Park South Station Master Association,
Inc., may enforce this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall not be construed as in any way interfering with the
ownership and control of the streets, roadways, and alleys of the Park South Station Master
Association, Inc., or its members as is now vested by law in that association or its members. The
speed limits within the Park South Station Community shall be the same as those in effect at the
time of ratification of this act. Any proposed change in the speed limit shall be submitted to and
approved by the Charlotte City Council. Pursuant to G.S. 20-141, the Charlotte City Council may
authorize by ordinance higher or lower speeds.
SECTION 4. This act applies only to the City of Charlotte.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S202-v-1*